Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2325.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-EEDUCATOR EXPENSES TAX CREDITSection 1701-E. Scope of article.This article relates to the educator expenses tax credit.Section 1702-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Educator expenses." Costs to cover the purchase of instructional materials or supplies that are designated for classroom use in a school entity or nonpublic school, as determined by the department."Nonpublic school." As defined in section 923.3-A(b)."Professional employee." As the term "professional employe" is defined in section 1101(1)."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 1703-E. Tax credit.For taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2025, a professional employee shall be allowed a tax credit for educator expenses purchased by the professional employee in the amount paid during the taxable year, or $500, whichever is less.Section 1704-E. Limitations.A professional employee is not entitled to carry forward, carry back, sell or assign all or a portion of a tax credit granted to the professional employee under this article.Section 1705-E. Department responsibilities.The department shall:(1) Promulgate rules and regulations to administer the provisions of this article.(2) In consultation with the Department of Education, determine the educator expenses that qualify under this article.(3) Post guidelines of the educator expenses tax credit on its publicly accessible Internet website.20260HB2325PN3100 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Submit an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives regarding the educator expenses tax credit program. The report shall include the number of professional educators who received tax credits under this article and the total dollar amount of tax credits awarded under this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2325PN3100 - 3 - 123456789